Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1523
Accumulation of junk; unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any property owner or person in lawful possession of property to allow the accumulation of junk on property that is not purely agricultural in character to the extent that such accumulation is a potential hazard to health.

Laws 1971, LB 939, § 23.